North Carolina, session 2025, SB299.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 126-23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 126-23. Certain records to be kept by State agencies open to inspection.
(a) Each department, agency, institution, commission and bureau of the State shall
maintain a record of each of its employees, showing the following information with respect to
each such employee:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (g) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that department, agency,
institution, commission, or bureau.bureau:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the department, agency, institution, commission,
or bureau. If the disciplinary action was a dismissal, bureau, a copy of the
written notice of the final decision of the head of the department setting forth
the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(g) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(a)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
*S299-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (a) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 126-22(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) For purposes of this Article the following definitions apply:
(1) "Employee" means any current State employee, former State employee, or
applicant for State employment.employment subject to this Article.
(2) "Employer" means any State department, university, division, bureau,
commission, council, or other agency subject to Article 7 of this Chapter.this
Article. The term "university" shall include all of the following, as defined in
G.S. 116-2:
a. The Board.
b. The Board of Trustees.
c. Chancellor.
d. Constituent institutions.
e. The President.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-320 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-320. Certain records open to inspection.
(a) Each local board of education shall maintain a record of each of its employees,
showing the following information with respect to each employee:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (e) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that local board of
education.education:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the local board of education. If the disciplinary
action was a dismissal, education, a copy of the written notice of the final
decision of the local board education setting forth the specific acts or
omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(e) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(a)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
Page 2 Senate Bill 299-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsection (a) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115D-28 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-28. Certain records open to inspection.
(a) Each board of trustees shall maintain a record of each of its employees, showing the
following information with respect to each employee:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (e) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that community
college.college:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the community college. If the disciplinary action
was a dismissal, college, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of
the board of trustees setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the
basis of the dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(e) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(a)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (a) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 4. G.S. 122C-158 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-158. Privacy of personnel records.
…
(b) The following information with respect to each employee is a matter of public record:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (j) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that area
authority.authority:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
Senate Bill 299-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the area authority. If the disciplinary action was
a dismissal, authority, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the
area authority setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of
the dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(j) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(b)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 5. G.S. 130A-45.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-45.9. Confidentiality of personnel information.
…
(b) The following information with respect to each employee of a public health authority
is a matter of public record:
(1) name; Name.
(2) age; Age.
(3) date Date of original employment or appointment; appointment.
(4) beginning Beginning and ending dates, dates.
(5) position title, Current position and title.
(6) position descriptions, Position description.
(7) Current salary and total compensation of current and former positions;
positions. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "total compensation"
includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms
of compensation paid by the employing entity.
(8) the The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether
written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the authority has the written
contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession, possession.
(9) and date Date and type of the most recent each promotion, demotion, transfer,
suspension, separation, or other change in position classification.
(10) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, date and general description of the
reasons for each of the following with that public health authority:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
Page 4 Senate Bill 299-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) For each dismissal for disciplinary reasons taken by the public health
authority, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the public health
authority setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the
dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
(13) In addition, the following information with respect to each licensed medical
provider employed by or having privileges to practice in a public health
facility shall be a matter of public record: educational history and
qualifications, date and jurisdiction or original and current licensure; and
information relating to medical board certifications or other qualifications of
medical specialists. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "total
compensation" includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and
all other forms of compensation paid by the employing entity.
…
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(e) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(b)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 6. G.S. 131E-257.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-257.2. Privacy of employee personnel records.
…
(b) The following information with respect to each public hospital employee is a matter
of public record:
(1) Name.
(2) Age.
(3) Date of original employment.
(4) Current position title.
(5) Date of the most recent and type for each promotion, demotion, transfer,
suspension, separation or other change in position classification.
(6) The office to which the employee is currently assigned.
(7) Subject to subsection (j) of this section, date and general description of the
reasons for each of the following with that public hospital:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(8) For each dismissal for disciplinary reasons taken by the public hospital, a copy
of the written notice of the final decision of the public hospital setting forth
the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.
Senate Bill 299-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) In addition, the following information with respect to For each licensed
medical provider employed by or having privileges to practice in a public
hospital shall be a matter of public record: hospital, the following information:
educational history and qualifications, date and jurisdiction or original and
current licensure; and information relating to medical board certifications or
other qualifications of medical specialists.
…
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(j) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision (b)(7)
of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 153A-98 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-98. Privacy of employee personnel records.
…
(a1) This section shall apply to all employees subject to G.S. 153A-103.
(b) The following information with respect to each county employee is a matter of public
record:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (h) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that county.county:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the county. If the disciplinary action was a
dismissal, county, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the
county setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the
dismissal.
(12) The office to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(h) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(b)(10) of this section:
Page 6 Senate Bill 299-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 153A-99(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Definitions. For the purposes of this section:
(1) "County employee" or "employee" means any person employed by a county
or any department or program thereof that is supported, in whole or in part, by
county funds;funds but shall not include employees subject to G.S. 153A-103;
(2) "On duty" means that time period when an employee is engaged in the duties
of his or her employment; and
(3) "Workplace" means any place where an employee engages in his or her job
duties."
SECTION 8. G.S. 160A-168 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-168. Privacy of employee personnel records.
…
(b) The following information with respect to each city employee is a matter of public
record:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (h) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that
municipality.municipality:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the municipality. If the disciplinary action was
a dismissal, municipality, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of
the municipality setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis
of the dismissal.
(12) The office to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(h) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(b)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
Senate Bill 299-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 9. G.S. 162A-6.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 162A-6.1. Privacy of employee personnel records.
…
(b) The following information with respect to each authority employee is a matter of
public record:
…
(10) Date Subject to subsection (j) of this section, date and general description of
the reasons for each promotion of the following with that authority.authority:
a. Promotion.
b. Demotion.
c. Transfer.
d. Suspension.
e. Separation.
f. Dismissal.
(11) Date and type of For each dismissal, suspension, or demotion dismissal for
disciplinary reasons taken by the authority. If the disciplinary action was a
dismissal, authority, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the
authority setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the
dismissal.
(12) The office to which the employee is currently assigned.
…
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any
confidential information protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (HIPAA), 110 Stat. 1936, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), 104 Stat.
327, or other applicable law.
(j) The following shall apply to the general descriptions as required by subdivision
(b)(10) of this section:
(1) No general description shall disclose information otherwise prohibited from
disclosure by an applicable law but shall be listed as "description of action
prohibited by applicable law."
(2) The general description for each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal shall become part of the record maintained under
subsection (b) of this section upon the later of the expiration of the time period
to file an appeal under any applicable administrative appeals process or a final
decision being entered in that administrative appeals process."
SECTION 10.(a) No later than November 30, 2025, each employer affected by this
act shall adopt personnel policies to effectuate this act to permit all of its employees to challenge
the wording of the general description of any promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension,
separation, or dismissal occurring on or after December 1, 2025.
SECTION 10.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 11. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective December
1, 2025, and applies to promotions, demotions, transfers, suspensions, separations, and dismissals
occurring on or after that date.
Page 8 Senate Bill 299-First Edition